Vermont, session 2025-2026, H380.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 7559 is amended to read:
§ 7559. VIOLATIONS OF CONDITIONS OF RELEASE; FAILURE TO
APPEAR; WARRANTLESS ARREST
(a) The State’s Attorney may commence a prosecution for criminal
contempt under Rule 42 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure against a
person who violates a condition of release imposed under section 7554 of this
title. The maximum penalty that may be imposed under this section shall be a
fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for six months not more than three years, or
both.
VT LEG #381143 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.380
2025 Page 2 of 3
* * *
(c) A person who has been released pursuant to section 7554 of this title
with or without bail on condition that the person appear at a specified time and
place in connection with a prosecution for an offense and who without just
cause fails to appear shall be imprisoned not more than two three years or fined
not more than $5,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; POSITIONS;
APPROPRIATION
(a) To the extent funds are available, 12 new, permanent, classified Pretrial
Supervision Officers are created in fiscal year 2026 within the Department of
Corrections. In addition to any other duties deemed appropriate by the
Commissioner of Corrections, the Pretrial Supervision Officers shall supervise
Pretrial Supervision Program participants in accordance with 13 V.S.A.
§ 7555.
(b) To the extent funds are available, two new, permanent, classified
administrative support positions are created in fiscal year 2026 within the
Department of Corrections. In addition to any other duties deemed appropriate
by the Commissioner of Corrections, the administrative support positions shall
assist in the administration and operation of the Pretrial Supervision Program
in accordance with 13 V.S.A. § 7555.
VT LEG #381143 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.380
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381143 v.1